Vermont, session 2025-2026, H684.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. § 1222 is amended to read:
§ 1222. INSPECTION OF REGISTERED VEHICLES
* * *
(b)(1) The inspections shall be made at garages or qualified service
stations, designated by the Commissioner as inspection stations, for the
purpose of determining whether those motor vehicles are properly equipped
and maintained in good mechanical condition; provided, however, the scope of
the safety inspection of a motor vehicle other than a school bus or a
commercial motor vehicle shall be limited to parts or systems that are relevant
to the vehicle’s safe operation, and such vehicles.
VT LEG #386109 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.684
2026 Page 2 of 3
(2)(A) For commercial motor vehicles and all motor vehicles with a
gross vehicle weight rating of at least 10,001 pounds, a vehicle shall not fail
the safety portion of the inspection unless the condition of the part or system
poses or may pose a danger to the operator or to other highway users.
(B) For noncommercial motor vehicles with a gross vehicle weight
rating of 10,000 pounds or less, a vehicle shall not fail the safety portion of the
inspection on account of the condition of a part or system. An inspection
station shall:
(i) provide a vehicle owner with notice of any part or system
whose condition poses or may pose a danger to the operator or to other
highway users;
(ii) identify any repairs or other work necessary to repair or
otherwise address the condition of the part or system; and
(iii) provide an estimate of the cost of any identified repairs and
work.
(C) Notwithstanding subdivisions (A) and (B) of this subdivision (2),
a motor vehicle that fails the emissions or on board diagnostic (OBD) systems
portion of the inspection shall be required to have any necessary repairs to the
vehicle’s emissions control components performed and the vehicle retested to
ensure that it passes the emissions and OBD systems portion of the inspection
prior to receiving a valid certificate of inspection.
VT LEG #386109 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.684
2026 Page 3 of 3
(2)(3) The charges for such inspections made by garages or qualified
service stations designated to conduct periodic inspections shall be subject to
the approval of the Commissioner. If a fee is charged for inspection, it shall be
based upon the hourly rate charged by each official inspection station or it may
be a flat rate fee, and, in either instance, the fee shall be prominently posted
and displayed beside the official inspection station certificate. In addition, the
official inspection station may disclose the State inspection certificate charge
on the repair order as a separate item and collect the charge from the consumer.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386109 v.2